Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-161
Client records; maintained by Department of Health and Human Services; access.

All client records from the Nebraska Industrial Home at Milford shall be maintained by the Department of Health and Human Services as confidential records but shall be accessible as provided by statute or by the rules and regulations of the department.

Laws 1993, LB 205, § 7;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 123;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 107.